New Jersey, session 221, A5444.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 11 of P.L.2003, c.207 (C.17B:27E-11) is amended to read as follows: 11.  An insurer providing long-term care insurance issued on an individual or group basis in this State shall file, for the commissioner's approval, its rates, rating schedule and supporting documentation demonstrating that it is in compliance with the applicable loss ratio standards of this State.  All filings of rates and rating schedules shall demonstrate that the benefits are reasonable in relation to the premium charged and that the rates are not excessive, inadequate or unfairly discriminatory. (cf: P.L.2003, c.207, s.11) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.